Utah statutes.
59-2-1010.   Statement of equalization to be sent to county auditors.
When the equalization among the several counties is completed, the commission
shall transmit to each county auditor and to the state auditor a statement of
the changes made by it in the assessment books of each county or any
assessment contained in the book, which is prima facie evidence of the
regularity of all proceedings of the commission resulting in the action which
is the subject matter of the statement.
